Illinois, session 104th, HB2895.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Telehealth Act is amended by changing 5Section 10 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 150/10)7    Sec. 10. Practice authority. A health care professional 8treating a patient located in this State through telehealth 9services must be licensed or authorized to practice in 10Illinois. A health care professional with a temporary permit 11for full practice advanced practice registered nurse for 12health care, a temporary permit for advanced practice 13registered nurse for health care, or a temporary permit for 14health care may treat a patient located in this State through 15telehealth services in a manner consistent with the health 16care professional's scope of practice and agreement with a 17sponsoring entity.18    An out-of-state health care professional may treat a 19patient located in this State through telehealth if the 20patient is a student attending an institution of higher 21education in this State, but is otherwise not a resident of the 22State when not attending the institution of higher education. 23(Source: P.A. 102-104, eff. 7-22-21; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23.)